District of Columbia statutes.
22-1835

Unlawful conduct with respect to documents in furtherance of human trafficking.

It is unlawful for an individual or business knowingly to destroy, conceal, remove, confiscate, or possess any actual or purported government identification document, including a passport or other immigration document, or any other actual or purported document, of any person to prevent or restrict, or attempt to prevent or restrict, without lawful authority, the person’s liberty to move or travel in order to maintain the labor or services of that person.

History

Oct. 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-239, § 105, 57 DCR 5405

Section References

This section is referenced in § 14-311, § 22-1836, § 22-1837, and § 22-1840.